fi: Pyörän keskiön sijoittelu: Keskiasetettu pyörä; Offset-pyörä; Sivulle asetettu pyörä; Muu
pt-BR: Colocação do cubo da roda: Roda central; Roda com offset; Roda lateral; Outro
es: Ubicación del cubo de rueda: Rueda de montaje central; Rueda desplazada; Rueda desplazada lateralmente; Otros
pt-PT: Posicionamento do cubo da roda: Roda central; Roda de compensação; Roda lateral; Outro
ru: Расположение ступицы колеса: Центральное колесо; Смещенное колесо; Боковое колесо; Другое
el: Τοποθέτηση πλήμνης τροχού: Τροχός κεντραρίσματος; Τροχός όφσετ; Πλαϊνός τροχός; Άλλο
sl-SI: Namestitev pesta kolesa: Sredinsko kolo; Zamaknjeno kolo; Stransko nastavljeno kolo; Drugo
zh-TW: 輪軸位置: 中心輪; 位移輪; 邊緣輪; 其他
th: ตำแหน่งดุมล้อ: ล้อชุดกลาง; ล้อออฟเซ็ต; ล้อชุดข้าง; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Amplasarea butucului roții: Roată centrală; Roată decalată; Roată cu reglaj lateral; Altele
nl: Plaatsing wielnaaf: Gecentreerd wiel; Offset wiel; Zijdelings wiel; Andere
it: Posizionamento del mozzo della ruota: Disco centrale; Disco di compensazione; Disco laterale; Altro
hr-HR: Položaj glavčine kotača: Središnji kotač; Pomaknuti kotač; Bočni kotač; Ostalo
lt-LT: Ratukų stebulės vieta: Centrinis ratas; Ofsetinis ratas; Šoninis ratas; Kita
en: Wheel hub placement: Centerset wheel; Offset wheel; Side-set wheel; Other
pl: Umiejscowienie piasty koła: Koło centrujące; Koło odsadzające; Koło nastawcze; Inne
da: Placering af hjulnav: Centreret hjul; Forskudt hjul; Sidestillet hjul; Andet
cs: Umístění pohonu: Středové kolo; Odsazené kolo; Bočně uložené kolo; Jiné
zh-CN: 轮毂放置位置: 中心轮; 偏置轮; 侧置轮; 其他
bg-BG: Разположение на главината на колелото: Централно колело; Офсетно колело; Колело със странична настройка; Други
sv: Hjulnavsplacering: Centersethjul; Offsethjul; Sidoställt hjul; Övrigt
de: Radnabenplatzierung: Centerset-Rolle; Offset-Rolle; Sideset-Rolle; Sonstiges
vi: Vị trí ổ trục bánh xe: Bánh xe đặt trung tâm; Bánh xe đặt lệch; Bánh xe đặt bên; Khác
nb: Hjulnavplassering: Sentrert hjul; Forskjøvet hjul; Sidejustert hjul; Annet
ko: 휠 허브 배치: 센터셋 휠; 오프셋 휠; 사이드셋 휠; 기타
fr: Emplacement du moyeu de roue: Roue centrée; Roue décalée; Roue à déport latéral; Autre
tr: Tekerlek Göbeği Konumu: Centerset tekerlek; Ofset tekerlek; Sideset tekerlek; Diğer
hu: Kerékagy elhelyezkedése: Középső kormánykerék; Előre tolt kormánykerék; Oldalsó kormánykerék; Egyéb
sk-SK: Umiestnenie náboja kolesa: Stredové koleso; Ofsetové koleso; Bočné koleso; Iné
ja: ホイールハブの位置: センターセットホイール; オフセットホイール; サイドセットホイール; その他